Utah statutes.
62A-15-108.   Formula for allocation of funds to local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities.

(1)  The division shall establish, by rule, formulas for allocating funds to local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities through contracts, to provide substance abuse prevention and treatment services in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and Title 17, Chapter 43, Part 2, Local Substance Abuse Authorities, and mental health services in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and Title 17, Chapter 43, Part 3, Local Mental Health Authorities.  The formulas shall provide for allocation of funds based on need.  Determination of need shall be based on population unless the division establishes, by valid and accepted data, that other defined factors are relevant and reliable indicators of need.  The formulas shall include a differential to compensate for additional costs of providing services in rural areas.

(2)  The formulas established under Subsection (1) apply to all state and federal funds appropriated by the Legislature to the division for local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities, but does not apply to:

(a)  funds that local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities receive from sources other than the division;

(b)  funds that local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities receive from the division to operate specific programs within their jurisdictions which are available to all residents of the state;

(c)  funds that local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities receive from the division to meet needs that exist only within their local areas; and

(d)  funds that local substance abuse authorities and local mental health authorities receive from the division for research projects.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2009 General Session

